Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1264
Funds; when offered; time deposit open account; state investment officer; powers.

Funds shall be offered for deposit as they become available. The time of such deposit shall be known as an investment date. The state investment officer may make prudent interim investments. If the funds available for investment are less than the amount required for banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions under section 72-1263, the state investment officer shall prorate the available funds among the desiring banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1978, LB 258, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 36;

Laws 2002, LB 957, § 27;

Laws 2003, LB 175, § 5.